Hawaii statutes.
§353-22.6 Victim restitution. [Repeal
and reenactment on July 1, 2018. L 2013, c 67, §2.] The director of
public safety shall enforce victim restitution orders against all moneys earned
by the inmate or deposited or credited to the inmate's individual account while
incarcerated. The amount deducted shall be twenty-five per cent of the total
of all moneys earned, new deposits, and credits to the inmate's individual
account. The moneys intended for victim restitution shall be deducted monthly
and paid to the victim once the amount reaches $25, or annually, whichever is
sooner. This section shall not apply to moneys earned on work furlough
pursuant to section 353-17. [L 1987, c 127, §1 and c 338, §10; am L 1988, c
141, §32; am L 1989, c 211, §8; am L 2012, c 139, §§10, 14(4)]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next